newsrecommender/src/main/resources/hu_HU/hu_HU.aff
SFX t 0 eiddel [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eidből [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eidben [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eidbe [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eid [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eiből [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eiben [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 eibe [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
SFX t 0 ei [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-]
